Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1534.01
Director; power to protect members of the United States Armed Forces; rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to protect members of the United States Armed Forces from dishonest and predatory insurance sales practices by declaring certain identified practices to be false, misleading, deceptive, or unfair as required by the federal Military Personnel Financial Services Protection Act, Public Law 109-290, as such law existed on July 18, 2008.

Laws 2008, LB855, § 7.